California, session 20252026, AB1128.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Mobilehome Affordability Act.SEC. 2. Section 798.30.5 of the Civil Code is amended to read:798.30.5. (a) (1) Subject to subdivision (b), management shall not, over the course of any 12-month period, increase the gross rental rate for a tenancy in a qualified mobilehome park more than 3 percent plus the percentage change in the cost of living, or 5 percent, whichever is lower, of the lowest gross rental rate charged for a tenancy at any time during the 12 months prior to the effective date of the increase.(2) If the same homeowner maintains a tenancy over any 12-month period, the gross rental rate for the tenancy shall not be increased in more than two increments over that 12-month period, subject to the other restrictions of this subdivision governing gross rental rate increase.(b) For a new tenancy in which no homeowner from the prior tenancy remains in lawful possession of the mobilehome space, management may establish the initial rental rate not subject to subdivision (a), unless the applicable local agency or jurisdiction has adopted an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that limits the allowable rental rate for a new tenancy, in which case that ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure shall apply. Subdivision (a) shall be applicable to subsequent increases after that initial rental rate has been established, except as otherwise provided in this section.(c) A homeowner with a tenancy subject to this section shall not enter into a sublease that results in a total rent for the premises that exceeds the allowable rental rate authorized by subdivision (c) of Section 798.23.5. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes a homeowner to sublet or assign the homeowner’s interest where otherwise prohibited.(d) Management shall provide notice of any increase in the rental rate, pursuant to subdivision (a), to each homeowner in accordance with Section 798.30.(e) This section shall not apply to a tenancy for any of the following:(1) A mobilehome space restricted by deed, regulatory restriction contained in an agreement with a government agency, or other recorded document as affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code, or subject to an agreement that provides housing subsidies for affordable housing for persons and families of very low, low, or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code or comparable federal statutes.(2) A mobilehome space constructed and maintained in connection with any higher education institution within the state for use and occupancy by students in attendance at the institution.(3) A mobilehome space subject to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that restricts annual increases in the rental rate to an amount less than that provided in subdivision (a).(4) A mobilehome space within a resident-owned mobilehome park, as defined in Section 799.(f) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (g), this section applies to all rent increases of a mobilehome park occurring on or after January 5, 2026.(B) The amendments made to this section by the act that added this subdivision shall become operative on January 1, 2027.(2) In the event that management of a mobilehome park not described in subdivision (g) has increased the rent by more than the amount permissible under subdivision (a) between January 5, 2026, and January 1, 2027, both of the following shall apply:(A) The applicable rent on January 1, 2027, shall be the rent as of January 5, 2026, plus the maximum permissible increase under subdivision (a).(B) Management shall not be liable to a homeowner for any corresponding rent overpayment.(3) Management of a mobilehome park not described in subdivision (g) who increased the rental rate for a tenancy on or after January 5, 2026, but prior to January 1, 2027, by an amount less than the rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a) shall be allowed to increase the rental rate twice, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), within 12 months of January 5, 2026, but in no event shall that rental rate increase exceed the maximum rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a). (f)This(g) (1) (A) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), this section shall apply applies to all rent increases of a mobilehome park that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities occurring on or after February 18, 2021.(B) This section shall become section, as applied to a mobilehome park that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities, became operative January 1, 2022.(2) In the event that management of a mobilehome park that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities has increased the rent by more than the amount permissible under subdivision (a) between February 18, 2021, and January 1, 2022, both of the following shall apply:(A) The applicable rent on January 1, 2022, shall be the rent as of February 18, 2021, plus the maximum permissible increase under subdivision (a).(B) Management shall not be liable to a homeowner for any corresponding rent overpayment.(3) Management subject to subdivision (a) of a mobilehome park that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities who increased the rental rate for a tenancy on or after February 18, 2021, but prior to January 1, 2022, by an amount less than the rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a) shall be allowed to increase the rental rate twice, as provided in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), within 12 months of February 18, 2021, but in no event shall that rental rate increase exceed the maximum rental rate increase permitted by subdivision (a).(g)(h) Any waiver of the rights under this section shall be void as contrary to public policy. (h)(i) For the purposes of this section:(1) “Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items” means the following:(A) The Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items (CPI-U) for the metropolitan area in which the property is located, as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics, which are as follows:(i) The CPI-U for the Los Angeles-Long Beach-Anaheim metropolitan area covering the Counties of Los Angeles and Orange.(ii) The CPI-U for the Riverside-San Bernardo-Ontario metropolitan area covering the Counties of Riverside and San Bernardino.(iii) The CPI-U for the San Diego-Carlsbad metropolitan area covering the County of San Diego.(iv) The CPI-U for the San Francisco-Oakland-Hayward metropolitan area covering the Counties of Alameda, Contra Costa, Marin, San Francisco, and San Mateo.(v) Any successor metropolitan area index to any of the indexes listed in clauses (i) to (iv), inclusive.(B) If the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics does not publish a CPI-U for the metropolitan area in which the property is located, the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items as published by the Department of Industrial Relations.(C) On or after January 1, 2022, if the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics publishes a CPI-U index for one or more metropolitan areas not listed in subparagraph (A), that CPI-U index shall apply in those areas with respect to rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of the calendar year in which the 12-month change in that CPI-U, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3), (2), is first published. (2)“Management” means the management, as defined in Section 798.2, of a qualified mobilehome park. (3)(2) (A) “Percentage change in the cost of living” means the percentage change in the applicable Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items, as described in paragraph (1) and computed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph.(B) (i) For rent increases that take effect before August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of the immediately preceding calendar year and April of the year before that.(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of the immediately preceding calendar year and March of the year before that.(ii) For rent increases that take effect on or after August 1 of any calendar year, the following shall apply:(I) The percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for April of that calendar year and April of the immediately preceding calendar year.(II) If there is not an amount published in April for the applicable geographic area, the percentage change shall be the percentage change in the amount published for March of that calendar year and March of the immediately preceding calendar year.(iii) The percentage change shall be rounded to the nearest one-tenth of 1 percent. (4)“Qualified mobilehome park” means a mobilehome park, as defined in Section 798.4, that is located within and governed by the jurisdictions of two or more incorporated cities. (i)(j) (1) Nothing in this section affects the authority of a local government to adopt or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent. However, if a local ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure allows for a rental rate increase greater than that provided in subdivision (a), this section shall apply.(2) Nothing in this section alters the application of Sections 798.17, 798.45, or 798.49 to any ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure that establishes a maximum amount that may be charged for rent.(3) This section is not intended to express any policy regarding the appropriate, allowable rental rate increase limitations when a local government or jurisdiction adopts an ordinance, rule, regulation, or initiative measure regulating rent increases.(j)(k) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, 2036, and as of that date is repealed.SECTION 1.Section 44416.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:44416.5.(a)To improve both teacher retention and recruitment in California’s public school system, it is the intent of the Legislature to create a grant program to compensate student teachers in order to help alleviate financial stress at an important time in the teacher preparation process.(b)Subject to an appropriation of one-time funds by the Legislature for this purpose in the annual Budget Act or another statute, the California Student Teacher Support Grant Program is hereby established under the administration of the commission to compensate teaching credential candidates during the student teaching component of the 600 hours of clinical practice that is required as part of the candidate’s teacher preparation program. Stipends for each student teacher shall be equal to the daily substitute teacher rate for the applicant local educational agency. The commission shall issue a request for applications to all local educational agencies to solicit applications for funding pursuant to this section and shall adopt criteria for the selection of local educational agencies to participate in the grant program. The criteria adopted by the commission shall include both of the following:(1)An applicant local educational agency shall require participants to pass a criminal background check before participating in the grant program.(2)An applicant local educational agency shall certify that it has received a commitment from each participant that the participant will accomplish both of the following:(A)Complete all of the requirements for, and obtain, a multiple subject, single subject, or education specialist teaching credential.(B)Complete their 600 hours of clinical practice that is required as part of the participant’s teacher preparation program.(c)Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the commission shall, on or before January 1 of each year, report to the education policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature regarding the status of the grant program, including, but not limited to, the number of student teachers paid, the degree to which the applicant meets the teacher shortage needs of the local educational agency, and the ethnic and racial composition of the participants in the program. The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(d)For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, charter school, or county office of education.(e)It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation made to fund the grant program established by this section shall be applied toward the minimum funding requirements for school districts and community college districts imposed by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution.